Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 20. Internal Security and Public Safety
ACCD in consultation with VDH and the DPS/VEM shall issue guidance, which authorizes “micro-crews,” or no more than two (2) persons per location/job, to perform outdoor work and construction work in unoccupied
structures. Supporting operations may resume with the minimum number of employees necessary to support curbside pick-up and delivery services, and in accordance with the guidance issued by ACCD.

b.
ACCD shall clarify guidance for commercial retail operations, including those that operate in an outdoor setting, that they may resume operations with the minimum number of employees necessary to support curbside
pick-up, delivery services, and warehouse or distribution operations in support of curbside, or delivery. All orders must occur over the phone or online and no in-store transactions are allowed at this time.

c.
Services operating with a single worker (such as appraisers, realtors, municipal clerks, attorneys, property managers, pet care operators and others), may resume operations so long as no more than 2 persons (service
provider and client) are present at one time.

d.
Businesses and non-profit and government entities deemed critical in accordance with Addendum 6 to the Executive Order and ACCD Sector Guidance (Stay Home/Stay Safe), may continue to operate under pre-existing
guidance and shall operate in accordance with mandatory health and safety requirements set forth above.

e.
In accordance with Addendum 5 to the Executive Order (Order to Work From Home for all Businesses and Non-Profits) and Stay Home Stay Safe, all businesses, non-profit entities and government entities shall continue
procedures to support work from home and telecommuting for all workers to the extent possible.

f.
All businesses, not-for profit entities and government entities are encouraged to continue business strategies, procedures and practices to maximize use of on-line presence, telephone and web-based service delivery
and phone or online orders for term curb-side pick-up and delivery.

This Addendum 10 shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on May 15, 2020, at which time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health and the Department of Public Safety/Division
of Emergency Management shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Addendum.

Dated April 17, 2020

ADDENDUM 11 TO EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

[Work Smart & Stay Safe — Restart VT: Phase II]

WHEREAS, on March 7, 2020 and March 11, 2020, the Vermont Department of Health (VDH) detected the first two cases of COVID-19 in Vermont and a month and a half later Vermont has experienced over 800 cases and over 40 related deaths; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, the Governor, in consultation with VDH and the Vermont Agency of Human Services, has initiated aggressive and sustained efforts to protect property and public health, and to ensure public safety in this public health emergency including issuing
Addenda to the Executive Order to limit in-person contact, such as limiting the size of gatherings, closure of schools and the institution of remote learning through the end of the school year, suspending the operation of close
contact businesses, requiring telecommuting and work from home, requiring Vermonters to stay home and stay safe with exceptions for essential purposes and suspending the operation of businesses which are not deemed critical;
and

WHEREAS, modeling studies done for the State clearly show that, but for the mitigation measures taken to date, the number of COVID-19 cases and COVID-19 related deaths in the State and the region would be having a much more devastating effect on Vermonters
and would be threatening to overwhelm the capacity of the Vermont health care system; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has determined to begin a cautious, incremental and evidence-based approach to restarting Vermont’s economy; and

WHEREAS, as we move forward, businesses, governments and employees must understand that how they work is essential to resuming and maintaining business operations, to stay safe and save lives.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws hereby order as follows:

1.

Health and Safety Requirements.
The State shall continue a phased approach to reopen the economy, balancing the need to restore and strengthen our overall social and economic wellbeing with the prevention of a resurgence of COVID-19 that would
undermine or lose the important public health outcomes achieved to date. In order to achieve this balance, all businesses and non-profit and governmental entities, including employees and contractors of governmental entities,
which are operating or will be operating during the declared State of Emergency, shall implement the following physical distancing, health and sanitation measures in accordance with Vermont Department of Health, CDC and Agency
of Commerce and Community Development (ACCD) guidelines:

a.
Employees shall not report to, or be allowed to remain at, work or job site if sick or symptomatic (with fever, cough, and/or shortness of breath).

b.
Employees must observe strict social distancing of six feet while on the job.

c.
Employees must wear face coverings over their nose and mouth when in the presence of others. In the case of retail cashiers, a translucent shield or “sneeze guard” is acceptable in lieu of a mask.

d.
Employees must have easy and frequent access to soap and water or hand sanitizer during duration of work, and handwashing or hand sanitization should be required before entering, and leaving, job sites. All common
spaces and equipment, including bathrooms, frequently touched surfaces and doors, tools and equipment, and vehicles must be cleaned and disinfected at the beginning, middle and end of each shift and prior to transfer from one
person to another.

e.
No more than two (2) people shall occupy one vehicle when conducting work.

f.
To the extent feasible, prior to the commencement of each work shift, pre-screening, including temperature checks and survey shall be required to verify each employee has no symptoms of respiratory illness (fever,
cough, and/or shortness of breath).

g.
Signs must be posted at all entrances clearly indicating that no one may enter if they have symptoms of respiratory illness.

h.
No congregation of employees shall be permitted on site.

i.
No workers who have knowledge of contact with a worker who is diagnosed with COVID-19 shall be permitted on site and shall quarantine for 14 days.

j.
Indoor workspaces where more than two (2) employees are working must have good air circulation.

k.
All operations shall designate a health officer on-site at every shift responsible for ensuring compliance with Addendum 10 and this Addendum 11 to the Executive Order and applicable ACCD Guidance. This person
shall have the authority to stop or modify activities to ensure work conforms with the mandatory health and safety requirements.

l.
All employees, including those already working (except healthcare workers, first responders, and others already trained in infection control, personal protection/universal precautions), must complete, and employers
must document, a mandatory training on health and safety requirements as provided by VOSHA, or another training program that meets or exceeds the VOSHA-provided standard.

2.

Training Requirements.
All employers shall provide training and a written copy of standard operating procedures to be developed by the Vermont Occupational Safety and Health Agency (VOSHA), in consultation with VDH, on, at a minimum:

a.
The signs and symptoms of COVID-19 and an explanation of how the disease is spread;

b.
Information on appropriate social distancing and personal hygiene practices, including those set forth in this Addendum 11 to the Executive Order and applicable ACCD Guidance; and

c.
The types, proper use, limitations, location, handling, decontamination, removal, and disposal of any PPE being used.

Employers may adopt another training program that meets or exceeds the VOSHA-provided standard, or additional policies and procedures that are applicable to the employment environment and employees’ duties, which shall not be less restrictive than those
developed by VOSHA.

All businesses and non-profit and government entities in operation must complete and document mandatory health and safety training by May 4, 2020.

3.

Customer and General Public Mask Use.
Customers and the public in general, are encouraged to wear face coverings over their nose and mouth any time they are interacting with others from outside their households.

4.

Phased Restart.
Preventing outbreaks and limiting the spread of COVID-19 is the only way to avoid future business and social disruption. The success of this phased restart will depend in large part on the ability of employers
and employees to adhere to the public health, safety, and social distancing measures essential to limiting the spread of illness.

Subject to compliance by all affected businesses and non-profit and government entities with the health and safety requirements set forth above and ACCD guidance developed in consultation with VDH and the Department of Public Safety/Division of Emergency
Management, Phase 2 of this effort, effective April 27, 2020, will allow the following:

a.
“Micro-crews” or no more than five (5) persons per location/job, to perform outdoor work and construction work in unoccupied structures.

b.
Manufacturing and distribution operations may resume with a maximum of 5 (five) employees in any location if they are low-density and ensure employees are at least six feet apart at all times.

c.
Supporting operations may continue with the minimum number of employees necessary to support curbside pick-up and delivery services, and in accordance with the guidance issued by ACCD.

d.
Resumption of in-person shopping at outdoor retail operations, such as garden centers and greenhouses offering mulch, stone, plant, tree, seed sales;

provided, however,
these operations shall not permit any more than a maximum of 10 total people including customers and staff.

Outdoor retail operations shall take steps to schedule or stage customer visits, such as waiting in cars until ready, to ensure no congregation.

e.
Libraries may allow for curbside pickup for lending in accordance with guidance issued by the Department of Libraries.

5.

Farmers Market.
Subject to compliance with the health and safety requirements set forth above and ACCD guidance developed in consultation with VDH and the Department of Public Safety/Division of Emergency Management, effective
May 1, 2020, farmers markets may open using limited in-person operations to ensure consumer access to quality, healthy food;

provided, however:

a.
Farmer’s markets must adhere to all municipal ordinances and regulatory and permitting requirements prior to opening.

b.
Farmer’s markets must significantly alter their business practices to eliminate crowds and reduce contact between vendors and customers, including a transition away from shopping and social events to primarily
a food distribution system.

c.
Farmers markets shall use a “pre-order, local food pick-up” model to the extent possible and comply with any additional guidance issued by the Agency of Agriculture and Food Markets (AAFM).

6.

Education and Compliance.
VOSHA, VDH inspectors and AAFM inspectors shall, in the ordinary course of the performance of their duties, ensure businesses and non-profit and governmental entities have the information necessary to comply
with the health and safety requirements of this Addendum 11 to the Executive Order.

7.
Businesses and non-profit and government entities deemed critical in accordance with Addendum 6 to the Executive Order and ACCD Sector Guidance (Stay Home/Stay Safe), may continue to operate under pre-existing
guidance and shall operate in accordance with mandatory health and safety and training requirements set forth above.

8.
In accordance with Addendum 5 to the Executive Order (Order to Work From Home for all Businesses and Non-Profits) and Stay Home Stay Safe, all businesses, non-profit entities and government entities shall continue
procedures to support work from home and telecommuting for all workers to the extent possible.

9.
All businesses, not-for-profit entities and government entities are encouraged to continue business strategies, procedures and practices to maximize use of on-line presence, telephone and web-based service delivery
and phone or online orders for term curb-side pick-up and delivery.

This Addendum 11 shall take effect upon signing and, except as modified in this Addendum 11, the Executive Order and all Addenda thereto and Directives issued thereunder, shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on May 15, 2020, at which
time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health and the Department of Public Safety/Division of Emergency Management shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Addendum.

Dated April 24, 2020

ADDENDUM 12 TO EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

[Work Smart & Stay Safe — Restart VT: Phase III]

WHEREAS, on March 7, 2020 and March 11, 2020, the Vermont Department of Health (VDH) detected the first two cases of COVID-19 in Vermont and almost two months later Vermont has experienced over 860 cases and over 45 related deaths; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, the Governor, in consultation with VDH and the Vermont Agency of Human Services, has initiated aggressive and sustained efforts to protect property and public health, and to ensure public safety in this public health emergency including issuing
Addenda to the Executive Order to limit in-person contact, such as limiting the size of gatherings, closure of schools and the institution of remote learning through the end of the school year, suspending the operation of close
contact businesses, requiring telecommuting and work from home, requiring Vermonters to stay home and stay safe with exceptions for essential purposes and suspending the operation of businesses which are not deemed critical;
and

WHEREAS, modeling studies done for the State clearly show that, but for the mitigation measures taken to date, the number of COVID-19 cases and COVID-19 related deaths in the State and the region would be having a much more devastating effect on Vermonters
and would be threatening to overwhelm the capacity of the Vermont health care system; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has undertaken a cautious, incremental and evidence-based approach to restarting Vermont’s economy; and

WHEREAS, as we move forward, businesses, governments and employees must understand that how they work is essential to resuming and maintaining business operations, to stay safe and save lives.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws hereby order as follows:

1.

Health and Safety Requirements.
The State shall continue a phased approach to reopen the economy, balancing the need to restore and strengthen our overall social and economic wellbeing with the prevention of a resurgence of COVID-19 that would
undermine or lose the important public health outcomes achieved to date. As previously established in Addendum 11 to the Executive Order, in order to achieve this balance, all businesses and non-profit and government entities,
including employees and contractors of government entities, which are operating or will be operating during the declared State of Emergency, shall implement the following physical distancing, health and sanitation measures
in accordance with Vermont Department of Health, CDC and Agency of Commerce and Community Development (ACCD) guidelines:

a.
Employees shall not report to, or be allowed to remain at, work or job site if sick or symptomatic (with fever, cough, and/or shortness of breath).

b.
Employees must observe strict social distancing of six feet while on the job. Businesses and non-profit or government entities shall ensure customers observe strict social distancing of six feet while on location,
to the extent possible.

c.
Employees must wear face coverings over their nose and mouth when in the presence of others. In the case of retail cashiers, a translucent shield or “sneeze guard” is acceptable in lieu of a mask.

d.
Employees must have easy and frequent access to soap and water or hand sanitizer during duration of work, and handwashing or hand sanitization should be required before entering, and leaving, job sites. All common
spaces and equipment, including bathrooms, frequently touched surfaces and doors, tools and equipment, and vehicles must be cleaned and disinfected regularly.

e.
No more than two people shall occupy one vehicle when conducting work.

f.
Prior to the commencement of each work shift, pre-screening, including temperature checks and health survey shall be required to verify each employee has no symptoms of respiratory illness (fever, cough, and/or
shortness of breath). At the present time non-contact thermometers are in short supply, however employers shall immediately order, and use their best efforts to obtain, thermometers in order to conduct routine temperature checks.

g.
Signs must be posted at all entrances clearly indicating that no one may enter if they have symptoms of respiratory illness.

h.
No congregation of employees shall be permitted on site.

i.
No workers who have knowledge of contact with a worker who is diagnosed with COVID-19 shall be permitted on site and shall quarantine for 14 days.

j.
Indoor workspaces where more than 2 employees are working must have good air circulation.

k.
All operations shall designate a health officer on-site at every shift responsible for ensuring compliance with the Executive Order and the Addenda thereto and applicable ACCD Guidance. This person shall have the
authority to stop or modify activities to ensure work conforms with the mandatory health and safety requirements.

l.
All employees, including those already working (except healthcare workers, first responders, and others already trained in infection control, personal protection/universal precautions), must complete, and employers
must document, a mandatory training on health and safety requirements as provided by VOSHA, or another training program that meets or exceeds the VOSHA-provided standard.

2.

Enhanced Training Requirements.
On April 27, 2020, Vermont Occupational Safety and Health Agency (VOSHA) developed a minimum level of health and safety training to be completed by all employees and documented by businesses and non-profit and
government entities in operation, no later than May 4, 2020. VOSHA has undertaken the preparation of translated versions of the training, and those employees and employers who require translated versions shall have an additional
week from the date of release of the translation to complete and document the training. VOSHA training establishes a minimum standard for training which will not be sufficient for all businesses and non-profit and government
entities to reopen safely during the COVID-19 pandemic.

Except as set forth below, employers, or industries, trade associations, chambers of commerce or similar representative organizations acting on behalf of employers, shall adopt a training program prior to reopening. In many cases, this will require a
plan that augments the VOSHA training standards with additional policies and procedures customized to the unique nature of the entity or sector-specific employment environment. Consideration shall be given to the ability of
a particular industry sector or business or non-profit or government entity to deliver goods or services in a manner that does not put either employees or the public at risk of exposure to the COVID-19 virus during an outbreak.

Augmented plans should assess the need to:

ACCD shall provide guidance and examples for developing health and safety training plans.

All businesses and non-profit and government entities who have suspended operations for 7 or more days under Addendum 6 to the Executive Order (Stay Home/Stay Safe) shall have on file a health and safety training plan prior to reopening. The plan shall
be made available to VOSHA or to any employee upon request.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, businesses and non-profits and government entities with fewer than 10 employees at any one office or site of operation, may elect to implement the VOSHA training.

• Adopt a phased approach to reopening which provides sufficient opportunity to operate first in a low density and low contact environment before making the incremental changes needed to accommodate more moderate density activity while continuing to maintain
health and safety.

• Update physical and administrative safety systems to accommodate COVID-19 VDH/CDC/VOSHA guidelines, health monitoring, including temperature checks, cleaning and sanitizing methods and physical distancing measures.

• Take appropriate measures to protect employees at greater risk of contact by virtue of their occupational role or setting.

3.

Customer and General Public Mask Use.
Customers and the public in general, are encouraged to wear face coverings over their nose and mouth any time they are interacting with others from outside their households. Businesses and non-profit and government
entities may require customers or clients to wear masks.

4.

Mask Use on Public Transit Conveyances or in Mass Transportation Facilities.
The traveling and commuting public shall wear face coverings over their nose and mouth any time they are using public transportation conveyances, including busses, trains and ride services and when in a mass
transportation station or terminal, including airports.

5.

Phased Restart.
Preventing outbreaks and limiting the spread of COVID-19 is the only way to avoid future business and social disruption. The success of this phased restart will depend in large part on the ability of employers
and employees to adhere to the public health, safety, and social distancing measures essential to limiting the spread of illness.

Subject to compliance by all affected businesses and non-profit and government entities with the health and safety requirements set forth above and ACCD guidance developed in consultation with VDH and the Department of Public Safety/Division of Emergency
Management, Phase 3 of this effort, effective May 4, 2020, will allow the following:

a.
Small crews of no more than ten (10) persons per location/job, to perform outdoor work and construction work in unoccupied job sites. An unoccupied job site may be a single unit in a commercial or residential structure.
“Unoccupied,” may include sites vacated for the duration of the construction work.

b.
Manufacturing and distribution operations may resume with a maximum of ten (10) employees in any location if they are low-density and ensure employees are at least six feet apart at all times.

c.
Supporting operations may continue with the minimum number of employees necessary to support curbside pick-up and delivery services, and in accordance with the guidance issued by ACCD.

6.

Manufacturing, construction, and distribution operations.
Subject to (1) compliance with the health and safety requirements set forth above and ACCD guidance and (2) the development of enhanced training programs as set forth above, effective May 11, 2020, manufacturing,
construction, and distribution operations may restart with as few employees as necessary to permit full operations while continuing to maintain health and safety.

7.

Education and Compliance.
VOSHA, VDH inspectors and AAFM inspectors shall, in the ordinary course of the performance of their duties, ensure businesses and non-profit and government entities have awareness of and access to the information
necessary to comply with the health and safety requirements of this Addendum 12 to the Executive Order.

8.
Businesses and non-profit and government entities deemed critical in accordance with Addendum 6 to the Executive Order and ACCD Sector Guidance (Stay Home/Stay Safe), may continue to operate under pre-existing
guidance and shall operate in accordance with mandatory health and safety and training requirements set forth above.

9.
In accordance with Addendum 5 to the Executive Order (Order to Work From Home for all Businesses and Non-Profits) and Stay Home/Stay Safe, all businesses, non-profit entities and government entities shall continue
procedures to support work from home and telecommuting for all workers to the extent possible.

10.
All businesses, not-for-profit entities and government entities are encouraged to continue business strategies, procedures and practices to maximize use of on-line presence, telephone and web-based service delivery
and phone or online orders for term curb-side pick-up and delivery.

This Addendum 12 shall take effect upon signing and, except as modified in this Addendum 12, the Executive Order and all Addenda thereto and Directives issued thereunder, shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on May 15, 2020, at which
time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health and the Department of Public Safety/Division of Emergency Management shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Addendum.

Dated May 1, 2020

ADDENDUM 13 TO EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

[Play Smart and Play Safe: Restart Phase V]

WHEREAS, on March 7, 2020 and March 11, 2020, the Vermont Department of Health (VDH) detected the first two cases of COVID-19 in Vermont and almost two months later Vermont has experienced over 900 cases and over 50 related deaths; and

WHEREAS, on Friday, March 13, 2020, the Governor issued Executive Order 01-20, Declaration of State of Emergency in Response to COVID-19 and National Guard Call-Out (“Executive Order”), declaring a state of emergency for the State of Vermont in response
to COVID-19; and

WHEREAS, the Governor, in consultation with VDH and the Vermont Agency of Human Services, has initiated aggressive and sustained efforts to protect property and public health, and to ensure public safety in this public health emergency including issuing
Addenda to the Executive Order to limit in-person contact, such as limiting the size of gatherings, closure of schools and the institution of remote learning through the end of the school year, suspending the operation of close
contact businesses, requiring telecommuting and work from home, requiring Vermonters to stay home and stay safe with exceptions for essential purposes and suspending the operation of businesses which are not deemed critical;
and

WHEREAS, modeling studies done for the State clearly show that, but for the mitigation measures taken to date, the number of COVID-19 cases and COVID-19 related deaths in the State and the region would be having a much more devastating effect on Vermonters
and would be threatening to overwhelm the capacity of the Vermont health care system; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has undertaken a cautious, incremental and evidence-based approach to restarting Vermont’s economy and recognizes the need to address expanded recreational and social opportunities for Vermonters as well; and

WHEREAS, as we move forward, Vermonters must understand that how they recreate and socialize is essential to staying safe and saving lives.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, the emergency powers set forth in 20 V.S.A. §§ 8, 9 and 11 and other laws hereby order as follows:

1.

Play Smart and Play Safe.
Addendum 6 to the Executive Order (Stay Home/Stay Safe), is hereby amended to make clear Vermonters may leave home to get fresh air and exercise and resume limited social interactions and gatherings of 10 or
fewer, preferably in outdoor settings, provided that physical distancing and protocols for hygiene consistent with guidance from VDH and the Centers for Disease Control (CDC), are observed. To keep disease from spreading this
means:

• Always staying home and away from others if you are sick with COVID-19, have recently been exposed to someone who has COVID-19, or just don’t feel well.

• Keeping a 6-foot distance from others when you meet people outside of your household.

• Frequently washing your hands (hand sanitizer is acceptable when soap and water are not available).

• Coughing and sneezing into your elbow (even if you are wearing a facial covering).

• Wearing a facial covering over your nose and mouth, as set forth further in Section 3 below.

Vermonters may leave home to participate in outdoor recreation and outdoor fitness activities that require low or no direct physical contact.

With respect to these limited social interactions or gatherings of 10 or fewer:

• Vermonters must prioritize protecting those at higher risk for severe illness.

• Continue to limit non-essential travel; all travel should be limited to Vermont to the extent possible and when you do travel, limit non-essential stops. Anyone who leaves Vermont for more than one day for non-essential travel is required to quarantine
at home for 14-days upon their return.

Older adults (age 65 and over), and people with underlying medical conditions, like heart and lung disease or diabetes, are more likely to develop severe illness. They should continue to shelter in place, and family and friends should do everything they
can to help keep them safe.

2.

Trusted Households.
Members of one household may choose to socialize — and allow children to play — with members of another household, such as family, neighbors or friends known to be following VDH/CDC health and safety precautions.
The Commissioner of VDH is hereby directed to issue guidance on recommended practices which allow Vermonters to reconnect with small groups of family and friends from “trusted households” in ways that allow them to relax some
physical distancing.

3.

General Public Mask Use.
All Vermonters are encouraged to wear face coverings over their nose and mouth any time they are interacting with others from outside their households, including in congregate outdoor settings. Masks are not
recommended for strenuous outdoor activity. Businesses and non-profit and government entities may require customers or clients to wear masks.

4.

Phased Restart: Phrase 5, Outdoor Recreation.
Preventing outbreaks and limiting the spread of COVID-19 is the only way to avoid future business and social disruption. The success of this phased restart will depend in large part on the ability of employers,
employees and the general public to adhere to the public health, safety, and social distancing measures essential to limiting the spread of illness.

Effective May 7, 2020, all businesses and non-profit and government entities which support or offer outdoor recreation and outdoor fitness activities that require low or no direct physical contact may begin operations, subject to compliance with the health
and safety guidelines and training requirements set out below, and applicable Agency of Commerce and Community Development (ACCD) guidance. These include, but are not limited to state and municipal parks, recreation associations,
trail networks, golf courses, big game check stations and guided expeditions. Campgrounds, marinas and beaches shall not be opened at this time. In addition, all businesses and non-profit and government entities which support
or offer outdoor recreation and fitness activities must implement the following measures:

• Require Vermonters participating in outdoor recreation and fitness activities to “arrive, play and leave.” Groups may not congregate before or after activities, for example, no tailgating.

• Post signage and institute registration processes that reinforce outdoor facilities are only open to Vermonters and those who have met the 14-day quarantine requirement.

• Post signage, discouraging contact sports and games.

• Eliminate services or transactions that result in touch points and/or staff-customer interactions that are not absolutely necessary.

• Reduce high contact surfaces and common areas, including closing waiting areas, removing picnic tables, closing play structures, and offering only rental equipment that can and will be thoroughly disinfected between users.

• Close indoor facilities that require in-person transactions (such as lobbies, pro-shops and other small retail operations, bars and restaurants), and deliver goods and services for curbside pickup, delivery or via online portals.

• Restroom facilities may only be opened if they can be regularly cleaned and disinfected in accordance with VDH/CDC guidelines.

5.

Health and Safety Requirements.
All businesses and non-profit and government entities which support or offer outdoor recreation and fitness activities shall implement the following physical distancing, health and sanitation measures in accordance
with VDH, CDC and ACCD guidelines:

a.
Employees shall not report to, or be allowed to remain at, work or job site if sick or symptomatic (with fever, cough, and/or shortness of breath).

b.
Employees must observe strict social distancing of six feet while on the job. Businesses and non-profit or government entities shall ensure customers observe strict social distancing of six feet while on location,
to the extent possible.

c.
Employees must wear face coverings over their nose and mouth when in the presence of others. In the case of retail cashiers, a translucent shield or “sneeze guard” is acceptable in lieu of a mask.

d.
Employees must have easy and frequent access to soap and water or hand sanitizer during duration of work, and handwashing or hand sanitization should be required before entering, and leaving, job sites. All common
spaces and equipment, including bathrooms, frequently touched surfaces and doors, tools and equipment, and vehicles must be cleaned and disinfected regularly.

e.
No more than two people shall occupy one vehicle when conducting work.

f.
Prior to the commencement of each work shift, pre-screening, including temperature checks and health survey shall be required to verify each employee has no symptoms of respiratory illness (fever, cough, and/or
shortness of breath). At the present time non-contact thermometers are in short supply, however employers shall immediately order, and use their best efforts to obtain, thermometers in order to conduct routine temperature checks.

g.
Signs must be posted at all entrances clearly indicating that no one may enter if they have symptoms of respiratory illness.

h.
No congregation of employees shall be permitted on site, except for necessary work.

i.
No workers who have knowledge of contact with a worker who is diagnosed with COVID-19 shall be permitted on site and shall quarantine for 14 days.

j.
Indoor workspaces where more than two employees are working must have good air circulation.

k.
All operations shall designate a health officer on-site at every shift responsible for ensuring compliance with the Executive Order and the Addenda thereto and applicable ACCD Guidance. This person shall have the
authority to stop or modify activities to ensure work conforms with the mandatory health and safety requirements.

l.
All employees, including those already working (except healthcare workers, first responders, and others already trained in infection control, personal protection/universal precautions), must complete, and employers
must document, a mandatory training on health and safety requirements as provided by VOSHA, or another training program that meets or exceeds the VOSHA-provided standard.

6.

Enhanced Training Requirements.
Businesses and non-profit and government entities, with over 10 employees, which support or offer outdoor recreation and fitness activities, or trade associations, chambers of commerce or similar representative
organizations acting on behalf of employers, shall adopt a health and safety training program prior to reopening. In many cases, this will require a plan that augments the VOSHA training standards with additional policies and
procedures customized to the unique nature of the entity or sector-specific employment environment. Consideration shall be given to the ability of a particular industry sector or business or non-profit or government entity
to deliver goods or services in a manner that does not put either employees or the public at risk of exposure to the COVID-19 virus during an outbreak. The plan shall be made available to VOSHA or to any employee upon request.

Augmented plans should assess the need to:

ACCD shall provide guidance and examples for developing health and safety training plans.

• Adopt a phased approach to reopening which provides sufficient opportunity to operate first in a low density and low contact environment before making the incremental changes needed to accommodate more moderate density activity while continuing to maintain
health and safety.

• Update physical and administrative safety systems to accommodate COVID-19 VDH/CDC/VOSHA guidelines, health monitoring, including temperature checks, cleaning and sanitizing methods and physical distancing measures.

• Take appropriate measures to protect employees at greater risk of contact by virtue of their occupational role or setting.

7.

Education and Compliance.
State agencies and departments which may regulate businesses and non-profit and government entities which support or offer outdoor recreation and fitness activities shall, in the ordinary course of the performance
of their duties, ensure businesses and non-profit and government entities have awareness of and access to the information necessary to comply with the health and safety requirements of this Addendum 13 to the Executive Order.

8.
Businesses and non-profit and government entities deemed critical in accordance with Addendum 6 to the Executive Order and ACCD Sector Guidance (Stay Home/Stay Safe), may continue to operate under pre-existing
guidance and shall operate in accordance with mandatory health and safety and training requirements set forth above.

9.
All businesses, not-for profit entities and government entities are encouraged to continue business strategies, procedures and practices to maximize use of on-line presence, telephone and web-based service delivery
and phone or online orders for term curb-side pick-up and delivery.

This Addendum 13 shall take effect upon signing and, except as modified in this Addendum 13, the Executive Order and all Addenda thereto and Directives issued thereunder, shall continue in full force and effect until midnight on May 15, 2020, at which
time the Governor, in consultation with the Vermont Department of Health and the Department of Public Safety/Division of Emergency Management shall assess the emergency and determine whether to amend or extend this Addendum.

Dated May 6, 2020

ADDENDUM 14 TO EXECUTIVE ORDER 01-20

[Extension of State of Emergency Declared March 13, 2020; Be Smart/Stay Safe]
